apertium-olo.olo.lexc
LEXICON N_SUARI/KIELI_01 !!= @CODE@ kieli:kiel
!! Gradation No
:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_SUARI/KIELI-SG ;
 N_SUARI/KIELI-PL ;

LEXICON N_SUARI/KIELI-SG
:%{front%} 	NMN_SUARI/KIELI-SG ;
LEXICON N_SUARI/KIELI-PL
:%{front%} 	NMN_SUARI/KIELI-PL ;

LEXICON N_KIELI !!= @CODE@ kieli:kiel
!! Harmony: Front
 N_KIELI-SG ;
 N_KIELI-PL ;

LEXICON N_KIELI-SG !!= @CODE@ kieli:kiel
:%{front%} NMN_KIELI-SG ;
LEXICON N_KIELI-PL !!= @CODE@ kieli:kiel
!! Harmony: Front
:%{front%} NMN_KIELI-PL ;



LEXICON N_LAPSI !!= @CODE@ lapsi:laps lapsi:laps
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_LAPSI-SG  ;
        N_LAPSI-PL  ;

LEXICON N_LAPSI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_LAPSI-SG ;

LEXICON N_LAPSI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_LAPSI-PL ;

LEXICON N_VEZI !!= @CODE@ vezi:ved
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
:%^D2Z%>i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_VEZI-SG ;
 N_VEZI-PL ;

LEXICON N_VEZI-SG
:%{front%} NMN_VUOZI/VEZI-SG ;

LEXICON N_VEZI-PL
:%{front%} NMN_VUOZI/VEZI-PL ;

LEXICON N_SUZI !!= @CODE@ suzi:su
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
:zi ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_SUZI-SG ;
 N_SUZI-PL ;

LEXICON N_SUZI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_SUZI-SG ;

LEXICON N_SUZI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_SUZI-PL ;

LEXICON N_VUOZI !!= @CODE@ vuozi:vuod
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
:%^D2Z%>i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_VUOZI-SG        ;
 N_VUOZI-PL        ;

LEXICON N_VUOZI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_VUOZI/VEZI-SG	;
LEXICON N_VUOZI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_VUOZI/VEZI-PL	;

!! !THREE-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEMS
LEXICON N_SYGYZY !!= @CODE@ sygyzy:sygyzy
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_SYGYZY-SG ;
        N_SYGYZY-PL ;

LEXICON N_SYGYZY-SG
:%{front%} NMN_SYGYZY-SG        ;

LEXICON N_SYGYZY-PL
:%{front%} NMN_SYGYZY-PL        ;

LEXICON N_VASKIČČU !!= @CODE@ vaskičču:vaskičča
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
:%^A2U ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_VASKIČČU-SG ;
        N_VASKIČČU-PL ;

LEXICON N_VASKIČČU-SG
:%{back%} NMN_VASKIČČU-SG        ;

LEXICON N_VASKIČČU-PL
:%{back%} NMN_VASKIČČU-PL        ;

!! !THREE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH TWO-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULAR
LEXICON N_KARJAL !!= @CODE@ karjal:karjal
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_KARJAL-SG ;
	N_KARJAL-PL ;
LEXICON N_KARJAL-SG !!= @CODE@ karjal:karjal
:	NMN_KARJAL-SG ;
LEXICON N_KARJAL-PL !!= @CODE@ karjal:karjal
:	NMN_KARJAL-PL ;

LEXICON N_MADAL !!= @CODE@ madal:madal
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_MADAL-SG ;
	N_MADAL-PL ;
LEXICON N_MADAL-SG !!= @CODE@ madal:madal
:	NMN_MADAL-SG ;
LEXICON N_MADAL-PL !!= @CODE@ madal:madal
:	NMN_MADAL-PL ;

LEXICON N_PIIRAI !!= @CODE@ piirai:piira CHECK THIS
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_PIIRAI-SG ;
        N_PIIRAI-PL ;

LEXICON N_PIIRAI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_PIIRAI/VERÄI-SG ;

LEXICON N_PIIRAI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_PIIRAI/VERÄI-PL ;

LEXICON N_VERÄI !!= @CODE@ veräi:verä CHECK THIS
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_VERÄI-SG ;
        N_VERÄI-PL ;

LEXICON N_VERÄI-SG
:%{front%} NMN_PIIRAI/VERÄI-SG ;

LEXICON N_VERÄI-PL
:%{front%} NMN_PIIRAI/VERÄI-PL ;


LEXICON N_KANDAI !!= @CODE@ kandai:kanda
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_KANDAI-SG ;
        N_KANDAI-PL ;

LEXICON N_KANDAI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_KANDAI-SG ;

LEXICON N_KANDAI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_KANDAI-PL ;

LEXICON  N_AVUAJU !!= @CODE@ 
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!!:%^A2U ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; Work needed
:%{back%}%>%{ijPRC%}a NMN_AVUAJU/KERIÄJY ;

LEXICON  N_KERIÄJY !!= @CODE@ piästäjy:piästä
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
!!:%^A2U ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; Work needed
:%{front%}%>%{ijPRC%}ä NMN_AVUAJU/KERIÄJY ;


LEXICON N_PAGIZII !!= @CODE@ pagizii:pagizi
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_PAGIZII-SG ;
 N_PAGIZII-PL ;
LEXICON N_PAGIZII-SG !!= @CODE@ 
:%{back%}%>%{ijPRC%} NMN_PAGIZII-SG ;
LEXICON N_PAGIZII-PL !!= @CODE@ 
:%{back%}%>%{ijPRC%} NMN_PAGIZII-PL ;

LEXICON N_HUOLETOI !!= @CODE@ huoletoi: huolet
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!:%^A2U ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; Work needed
 N_HUOLETOI-SG ;
 N_HUOLETOI-PL ;

LEXICON N_HUOLETOI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_HUOLETOI/JIÄTÖI-SG ;

LEXICON N_HUOLETOI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_HUOLETOI/JIÄTÖI-PL ;


LEXICON N_SAMMAL !!= @CODE@ sammal:sammal
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_SAMMAL-SG ;
 N_SAMMAL-PL ;

LEXICON N_SAMMAL-SG
:%{back%} NMN_SAMMAL-SG ;

LEXICON N_SAMMAL-PL
:%{back%} NMN_SAMMAL-PL ;

LEXICON N_TVER !!= @CODE@ tver:tver
 N_TVER-SG ;
 N_TVER-PL ;

LEXICON N_TVER-SG
:%{front%} NMN_TVER-SG ;

LEXICON N_TVER-PL
:%{front%} NMN_TVER-PL ;

LEXICON N_ŠOUFER !!= @CODE@ šoufer:šoufer
!! Vowel Harmony: Back
 N_ŠOUFER-SG ;
 N_ŠOUFER-PL ;

LEXICON N_ŠOUFER-SG
:%{back%} NMN_ŠOUFER-SG ;

LEXICON N_ŠOUFER-PL
:%{back%} NMN_ŠOUFER-PL ;

LEXICON N_VANUIN !!= @CODE@ vanuin:vanui
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!! Stem	     consonant n/m
!! Singular stem vowel 0/0/e
!! Plural stem vowel i
:n ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_VANUIN-SG ;
 N_VANUIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_VANUIN-SG
:%{back%} NMN_VANUIN-SG ;

LEXICON N_VANUIN-PL
:%{back%} NMN_VANUIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_SAMMUTIN !!= @CODE@ sammutin:sammutti
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!! Stem consonant n/m
!! Singular stem vowel 0/0/e
!! Plural stem vowel i
:%^WGStem%>n ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_SAMMUTIN-SG ;
 N_SAMMUTIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_SAMMUTIN-SG
:%{back%} NMN_SAMMUTIN/KEITIN-SG ;

LEXICON N_SAMMUTIN-PL
:%{back%} NMN_SAMMUTIN/KEITIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_KEITIN !!= @CODE@ keitin:keitti
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Front
!! Stem consonant n/m
!! Singular stem vowel 0/0/e
!! Plural stem vowel i
:%^WGStem%>n ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_KEITIN-SG ;
 N_KEITIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_KEITIN-SG
:%{front%} NMN_SAMMUTIN/KEITIN-SG ;

LEXICON N_KEITIN-PL
:%{front%} NMN_SAMMUTIN/KEITIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_LÄMMIN !!= @CODE@ lämmin:lämbi
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Front
:%^WGStem%>n ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_LÄMMIN-SG ;
 N_LÄMMIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_LÄMMIN-SG
:%{front%} NMN_LÄMMIN-SG ;

LEXICON N_LÄMMIN-PL
:%{front%} NMN_LÄMMIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_TAIGIN !!= @CODE@ taigin:taigin
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_TAIGIN-SG ;
 N_TAIGIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_TAIGIN-SG
:%{back%} NMN_TAIGIN-SG ;

LEXICON N_TAIGIN-PL
:%{back%} NMN_TAIGIN-PL ;

LEXICON N_KARJALAINE !!= @CODE@ karjalaine:karjala
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_KARJALAINE-SG     ;
 N_KARJALAINE-PL     ;

LEXICON N_KARJALAINE-SG
:%{back%} NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE-SG	 ;

LEXICON N_KARJALAINE-PL
:%{back%} NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE-PL	 ;

LEXICON N_LIYGILÄINE !!= @CODE@ liygiläine:liygilä
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_LIYGILÄINE-SG     ;
 N_LIYGILÄINE-PL     ;

LEXICON N_LIYGILÄINE-SG
:%{front%} NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE-SG	 ;

LEXICON N_LIYGILÄINE-PL
:%{front%} NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE-PL	 ;

LEXICON N_NAINE !!= @CODE@ naine:nai
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_NAINE-SG     ;
 N_NAINE-PL     ;

LEXICON N_NAINE-SG
:%{back%}    NMN_NAINE/KIELINE-SG         ;
LEXICON N_NAINE-PL
:%{back%}    NMN_NAINE/KIELINE-PL         ;

LEXICON N_KIELINE !!= @CODE@ kieline:kieli
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_KIELINE-SG     ;
 N_KIELINE-PL     ;

LEXICON N_KIELINE-SG
:%{front%}    NMN_NAINE/KIELINE-SG         ;
LEXICON N_KIELINE-PL
:%{front%}    NMN_NAINE/KIELINE-PL         ;

LEXICON N_TOINE !!= @CODE@ toine:to
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:%^A2U ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; Work needed
 N_TOINE-SG     ;
 N_TOINE-PL     ;

LEXICON N_TOINE-SG
:%{back%} NMN_TOINE-SG         ;

LEXICON N_TOINE-PL
:%{back%} NMN_TOINE-PL         ;



LEXICON N_RAIŠ !!= @CODE@ raiš:ra
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!:%^A2U ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; Work needed
	N_RAIŠ-SG	;
	N_RAIŠ-PL	;
LEXICON N_RAIŠ-SG
:	NMN_RAIŠ-SG	;

LEXICON N_RAIŠ-PL
:	NMN_RAIŠ-PL	;

LEXICON N_TOVESTEH !!= @CODE@ tovesteh:tovesteh
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_TOVESTEH-SG	;
	N_TOVESTEH-PL	;
LEXICON N_TOVESTEH-SG
:%{back%}	NMN_TOVESTEH/PEREH-SG	;

LEXICON N_TOVESTEH-PL
:%{back%}	NMN_TOVESTEH/PEREH-PL	;

LEXICON nouns
aiduveräi%<n%>:aidu#verä N_VERÄI  "aidan veräjä" ;
askel%<n%>:askel N_SAMMAL  "askel" ;
bloigeh%<n%>:bloigeh N_TOVESTEH-SG  "kellojen sointi" ;
eläjät%<n%>:elä N_KANDAI-PL  "asukkaat" ;
eläjät%<n%>:eläi N_KANDAI-PL  "asukkaat" ;
igenitöi-ägenitöi%<n%>:igenit-ägenit N_HUOLETOI  "etana-etana" ;
ičenvuardai%<n%>:ičen#vuarda N_PAGIZII  "askeetti" ;
jalguin%<n%>:jalgui N_VANUIN  "jalustin" ;
jägäl%<n%>:jägäl N_MADAL  "jäkälä" ;
kaksožet%<n%>:kakso N_NAINE-PL  "kaksoset" ;
kazvattai%<n%>:kazvatta N_KANDAI  "kasvattaja" ;
kaččiezet%<n%>:kaččie N_NAINE-PL  "katsojaiset" ;
keitinpiirai%<n%>:keitin#piira N_PIIRAI  "keitinpiiras" ;
keriäjy%<n%>:keriäja N_KERIÄJY  "kerääjä" ;
keriččimet%<n%>:keričči N_VANUIN-PL  "keritsimet" ;
kidžerät%<n%>:kidžer N_KARJAL-PL  "kiharat" ;
kieli%<n%>:kiel N_KIELI  "kieli" ;
kiidžin%<n%>:kiidži N_VANUIN  "vesisammal" ;
kolmekulmuviivatin%<n%>:kolme#kulmu#viivatti N_SAMMUTIN  "kolmioviivain" ;
koufienkeitin%<n%>:koufienkeitti N_KEITIN  "kahvinkeitin" ;
kuoret%<n%>:kuor N_KIELI-PL  "kuoret" ;
kynzi%<n%>:kynd N_VEZI  "kynsi" ;
kytkin%<n%>:kytki N_LÄMMIN  "kytkin" ;
käbäl%<n%>:käbälä N_MADAL  "käpälä" ;
käskylöičysvuozi%<n%>:käskylöičys#vuod N_VUOZI  "palvelusvuosi" ;
lapset%<n%>:laps N_KIELI-PL  "lapset" ;
lapsi%<n%>:laps N_LAPSI  "lapsi" ;
lodineh%<n%>:lodineh N_TOVESTEH  "kolina; kalina; lotina" ;
luistimet%<n%>:luisti N_VANUIN-PL  "luistimet" ;
lähenemine%<n%>:lähenemi N_KIELINE  "läheneminen" ;
lämmin%<n%>:lämmin N_LÄMMIN  "lämpö" ;
mečänkuadai%<n%>:mečänkuada N_KANDAI  "metsuri" ;
meččykyläine%<n%>:meččykylä N_LIYGILÄINE  "metsäkylä" ;
muahpanijazet%<n%>:muahpanija N_KARJALAINE-PL  "hautajaiset" ;
muanittelii%<n%>:muanitteli N_PAGIZII  "puoskari" ;
muurai%<n%>:muura N_PIIRAI  "muurain" ;
nänniniekkulapsi%<n%>:nänniniekku#laps N_LAPSI  "rintalapsi" ;
oblezjan%<n%>:oblezjan N_TAIGIN  "apina" ;
ojaine%<n%>:oja N_KARJALAINE  "(luonnon)oja" ;
omahižet%<n%>:omahi N_KARJALAINE-PL  "omaiset" ;
opastusvuozi%<n%>:opastus#vuod N_VUOZI  "opetusvuosi" ;
oravankynzi%<n%>:oravan#kynd N_VEZI  "kissankynsi" ;
ottolapsi%<n%>:otto#laps N_LAPSI  "ottolapsi" ;
piästäjy%<n%>:piästä N_AVUAJU  "päästäjä" ;
pygäl%<n%>:pygäl N_MADAL  "pykälä" ;
ribužet%<n%>:ribuž N_KARJALAINE-PL  "rievut" ;
ruadovuozi%<n%>:ruado#vuod N_VUOZI  "työvuosi" ;
ruissieni%<n%>:ruis#sien N_KIELI  "rousku" ;
ruohtimet%<n%>:ruohti N_VANUIN-PL  "rohtimet" ;
sana-toine%<n%>:sana-to N_TOINE  "jokunen sana" ;
semmoine%<n%>:semmo N_TOINE  "sellainen" ;
silmätöi%<n%>:silmätöi N_HUOLETOI  "silmäpuoli" ;
su%<n%>:suze N_SUZI  "susi (sananparsissa ym.)" ;
suonet%<n%>:suonet N_KIELI-PL  "sisälmykset" ;
suulagi%<n%>:suu#lagi N_RAIŠ  "suulaki" ;
suulagi%<n%>:suulagi N_RAIŠ  "suulaki" ;
suzi%<n%>:suze N_SUZI  "susi (sananparsissa ym., tav. hukka, suzi:suzen:suttu)" ;
sygyzy%<n%>:sygyzy N_SYGYZY  "syksy" ;
syömižet%<n%>:syömi N_KIELINE-PL  "ruuat" ;
tallustin%<n%>:tallusti N_VANUIN  "pohjallinen" ;
tiheikkö%<n%>:tiheikkö N_SYGYZY  "tiheikkö" ;
tinakynzi%<n%>:tina#kynd N_VEZI  "saituri" ;
tuoju%<n%>:tuoja N_KANDAI  "tuoja" ;
vaskičču%<n%>:vaskičča N_VASKIČČU  "vaskitsa" ;
veriät%<n%>:verä N_PIIRAI-PL  "ulko-ovet" ;
voimatoi%<n%>:voimat N_HUOLETOI  "sairas" ;
vuozikymmen%<n%>:vuozi#kymmen N_SAMMAL  "vuosikymmen" ;
šipai%<n%>:šipa N_PIIRAI  "karjalanpiirakka" ;
šoufer%<n%>:šoufer N_ŠOUFER  "kuljettaja" ;
LEXICON N_NEWWORDS
kulletin:kulletti N_SAMMUTIN ;
kuorisieni:kuori#sien N_KIELI ;
kuorittamine:kuorittami N_NAINE ;
käzimiäččyhkižuaju:käzi#miäččyh#kižuaja N_AVUAJU ;
levitändy:levitända N_KERIÄJY ;
lievendysaineh:lievendys#aineh N_TOVESTEH ;
lähtendyveräi:lähtendy#verä N_VERÄI ;
periäjy:periäja N_KERIÄJY ;
poliitiekantiedoilii:poliitiekan#tiedoili N_PAGIZII ;
pyörittelemine:pyörittelemi N_KIELINE ;
stiimul:stiimul N_TAIGIN ;
sähkömiärätin:sähkömiärätti N_KEITIN ;
taidomualuaju:taido#mualuaja N_AVUAJU ;
toreador:toreador N_KARJAL ;
tukkienkuivatin:tukkien#kuivatti N_SAMMUTIN ;
tulenduveräi:tulendu#verä N_VERÄI ;
uvvenaigaine:uvven#aiga N_KARJALAINE ;
vastumieline:vastu#mieli N_NAINE ;
ängerjäine:ängerjä N_LIYGILÄINE ;
